   Terrence Keating | Accuride Corporation | ZoomInfo.com


Terrence J Keating - Boonville, IN | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Terrence J Keating in Boonville, IN


Terrence J Keating

                                                                           Intelius found that Terrence J Keating  is  a male between 60 and 70 years old from Boonville, IN.  We have connected them to
                8 addresses,
                7 phones,
                and 6 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Age

Terrence J Keating is in his 60s

Terrence Has Lived In

Boonville, IN
Denver, CO
Indianapolis, IN

Terrence's Relatives

Terence Keating
Jean Keating
Mary Keating
Marcia Keating







Terrence J Keating



Zodiac SignScorpio



GenderMale



Professional Status
Board Member at St. Mary's Hospital



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Terrence? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Terrence, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Terrence J Keating
Get a Criminal Check on Terrence J Keating
Get a Public Record Report on Terrence J Keating
Get a People Search Report on Terrence J Keating


Terrence J Keating's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Terrence J Keating has lived as well as Terrence J Keating's phone numbers and email addresses.




Terrence J Keating Has Lived in 3 States
Indiana Address for Terrence J Keating


1199 H***** B*** 

Boonville, IN


Has Lived In

Boonville, IN
Denver, CO


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Terrence J Keating

(812) ***-**** - Boonville, IN 
(812) ***-**** - Evansville, IN 
(812) ***-**** - Newburgh, IN 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Terrence J Keating

t**************g@***.com
t*************g@***.com
h******r@***.com


Get Email Report




Terrence J Keating's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Terrence J Keating's academic history.  Find out which schools Terrence J Keating attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Terrence J Keating received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Terrence J Keating Has Attended 11 Schools
Wharton School of Business 2000 – 2000                              
Indiana University Bloomington               1976 – 1978               Terrence J Keating has a Master of Business Administration (mba) in Operations Management and Supervision               
Indiana University Bloomington               1976 – 1978               Terrence J Keating has a Master of Business Administration (mba), in Operations Management and Supervision               
Indiana University Bloomington               1976 – 1978               Terrence J Keating has a Master of Business Administration (mba), Operations Management and Supervision in Operations Management and Supervision               
Purdue University               1968 – 1972               Terrence J Keating has a Bachelor of Science (bs) in Manufacturing Engineering Technology/technician               
Purdue University               1968 – 1972               Terrence J Keating has a Bachelor of Science (bs), in Manufacturing Engineering Technology/technician               
Purdue University               1968 – 1972               Terrence J Keating has a Bachelor of Science (bs), Manufacturing Engineering Technology/technician in Manufacturing Engineering Technology/technician               
Warren Central High School               1965 – 1967                              
Warren Central High School               1963 – 1967                              
Scecina Memorial High School               1963 – 1967                              
Holy Spirit High School               1955 – 1963                              


Terrence J Keating's Professional Information
Information regarding Terrence J Keating's professional history.  Find out previous places Terrence J Keating has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Terrence J Keating Has Worked at 8 Places
Company: St. Mary's Hospital
               Title: Board Member
Company: Keating Enterprises, LLC
               Title: Consultant
Terrence J Keating's Experience
Title: Board Member
               Company: St. Mary's Hospital
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 bil and above - Employee Range: 100,000 and above. Established in 1969, St. Mary's Health Foundation is a charitable, not-for-profit entity of St. Mary's Health. Our aim is to develop and steward philanthropic gifts in support of the programs and services of St. Mary's, particularly as they relate to improving the health of the community and with special emphasis on providing for those who are poor and vulnerable. St. Mary's Health Foundation works to support the many needs of our healthcare ministry from educational opportunities for patients and staff to advanced technologies to support of special programs within our hospital and community that support our Mission of service. There are a number of different ways you can give to St. Mary's Health. From giving of your time to supporting our development of talent to other donation opportunities, no matter how you choose to support our ministry we thank you for your generosity.
Title: Consultant
               Company: Keating Enterprises, LLC
Job Details

Additional Professional Information on Terrence J Keating

 See Terrence J Keating's LinkedIn Profile



Terrence J Keating's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Terrence J Keating


Terrence J Keating's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Terrence J Keating's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Terrence Keating
Username Matches

                  TerrenceKeating
                  KeatingTerrence
                  Terrence.Keating
                  Keating.Terrence
                  Terrence_Keating
                  Keating_Terrence
                  Terrence-Keating
                  Keating-Terrence
                  TKeating
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
T Keating







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.































Terrence J. Keating Board of Directors | Dana Incorporated













 
MenuClose






Search
































Terrence J. Keating

Mr. Keating, 66, was Chairman of Accuride Corporation, a manufacturer and supplier of commercial-vehicle components, from 2007 to 2009. He served as Chief Executive Officer of Accuride from 2002 to 2006 and President from 2002 to 2005. He is currently a board member of Chart Industries, Inc., and previously served on the board of A. M. Castle & Co. Mr. Keating sits on the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, as well as the Audit Committee.






























Terrence J. Keating: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 24, 2017 7:09 AM ET
Machinery

Company Overview of Chart Industries, Inc.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Terrence J. Keating  Director, Chart Industries, Inc.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 3 Board Members in 3 different organizations across 3 different industries.See Board Relationships67$183,000
Background

		Mr. Terrence J. Keating, also known as Terry, served as the Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer and President at Transportation Technologies Industries Inc. Mr. Keating has experience leading public company operations and overseeing financial reporting. Mr. Keating served as the Chairman of Accuride Corp., from January 2, 2007 to January 2009, Chief Executive Officer from May 1, 2002 to October 2007 and also served as its President from May 2002 to January ... 2006. At Accuride Corp., he served as a Vice President of Operations since December 1996 and also served as its Senior Vice President of Operations and General Manager. Prior to Accuride Corp., Mr. Keating served as a Manager of Indianapolis Diesel Engine Plant of International Truck and Engine Corporation, a division of Navistar International Company. Mr. Keating has held various executive and management positions at Accuride and other manufacturers in the commercial vehicle and other industries. Mr. Keating has been a Director of Dana Incorporated since January 2008. He has been Director of Chart Industries, Inc. since 2014. He serves as a Director of Motor & Equipment Manufacturers Association. He served as a Director of A. M. Castle & Co. from December 13, 2007 to March 17, 2015. He served as a Director of Accuride Corp. from May 1, 2002 to January 2009. He is a Vice Chairman and Director of Heavy Duty Manufacturers Association. Mr. Keating holds a BS in Mechanical Engineering Technology from the Purdue University and an MBA in Operations from Indiana University.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
One Infinity Corporate Centre DriveGarfield Heights, Ohio 44125United StatesPhone: 440-753-1490Fax: 440-753-1491
Board Members Memberships
DirectorMotor & Equipment Manufacturers Association2008-PresentDirectorDana Incorporated2014-PresentDirectorChart Industries, Inc.
Education
BS Purdue UniversityMBA Indiana University, Bloomington
Other Affiliations
Accuride CorporationDana IncorporatedA.M. Castle & Co.Transportation Technologies Industries, Inc.Purdue UniversityIndiana University, BloomingtonMotor & Equipment Manufacturers Association


Annual Compensation
				There is no Annual Compensation data available.
				Stocks Options
				There is no Stock Options data available.
				Total Compensation
Total Annual Cash Compensation$85,500Total Calculated Compensation$183,000




Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONNamePosition/CompanyCompensationRandal Wayne Baker Chief Executive Officer, President and DirectorActuant Corporation$617.9KEugene Joseph Lowe IIICEO, President & DirectorSPX Corporation$784.1KF. Nicholas Grasberger III                                               CEO, President & DirectorHarsco Corporation$825.0KScott A. Buckhout Chief Executive Officer, President and DirectorCIRCOR International, Inc.$664.3KE. James Ferland Chairman and Chief Executive OfficerBabcock & Wilcox Enterprises, Inc.$978.5KCompensation as of Fiscal Year 2016.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Chart Industries, Inc., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























 


The Keating Companies
















KMSDevelopmentPartners

About
Services
People

Daniel Keating, III
Dennis Martin
Michael Sencindiver
Robert Henderson
Terrence McKenna
Robert Reed
John Sisti
Robert McCulley
Karen Donnelly
David Millman
John Kroll
Lisa Armstrong


Project Portfolio
Contact


The KeatingCompaniesKeatingConsultingRobertHendersonArchitectKeatingEnvironmentalManagement 

The Phoenix
		Suite 203
		1600 Arch Street
		Philadelphia, PA 19103
		267.232.5700 P
		267.232.5799 F
	




Keating
KMS
KC
RHA
KEM


 

EXPERIENCED.
				DILIGENT.
				FOCUSED.
Welcome to KMS Development Partners...a different kind of Development Company.

 


About
KMS Development Partners may be a new name, but it’s founded on the values and entrepreneurial spirit that have guided three highly accomplished individuals—Dan Keating, III, Dennis Martin and Mike Sencindiver.
The partnership bears the trademarks of unique individual skills and collective success. Together, they have developed millions of square feet of space, today valued in the billions of dollars, and continue to manage over two million square feet of space. Through many years of association in a predecessor company (Keating Development Company), they have crafted a unique portfolio of projects that is perhaps best defined as opportunistic and value focused.
The projects take many forms: many working on behalf of large institutional and government clients, others for our own account and still others to meet the specific project delivery requirements of a private sector client. They vary greatly in size, but project size and scale has always been subordinate to project economics, value creation and project viability. 




Services
KMS offers a full range of development services from conceptual planning and entitlement through asset and property management.

Site Due Diligence
Project Finance
LEED/Sustainability Analyses
Site Environmental Analyses
Public-Private Partnership Formation
Entity Structuring
Yield Analyses/Master Plan
Civic Engagement
Historic Preservation Analyses
Transit-Oriented Development
Security Studies
Owner’s Representative Services
Asset Management
Property Management
 



Site Due Diligence
Site due diligence is a process common to all of our projects and typically includes a broad range of project entitlement activities. We are especially proud of our project approval success rate that spans an exceptional range of project types—from mixed-use development to commercial and multi-family residential—to both urban and suburban locations requiring either new construction or restoration and reuse of existing structures.
Many of our projects have required substantial re-zoning effort, and many others have required specialized analyses and management of, for example, historic preservation and archaeological analyses, detailed security studies, or a waterfront approvals and redevelopment process. Please refer to other services for our project-specific experience in these areas.
Project Finance
Project finance asks the question, “How does the project get paid for?” The principals of KMS have answered this question as Owners, Developers and Owner’s Representatives. We have done so in the varied stages of the real estate cycle and in both good and bad economic times.
The principals have raised both equity and debt. Equity has sometimes come from internal capital and has also been raised from third parties, both private and institutional. The debt for our projects has been provided by banks, institutional lenders (such as insurance companies and pension funds), public bond issues, certificates of participation and government insured mortgages.
We have taken many paths to reducing project capital cost—for example, using tax credits on some projects and public grants on others.
In every instance our goal is to provide the lowest cost and most efficient capital, ensuring both initial delivery and long term viability of the project.
Representative projects include:

The Phoenix at Clarendon, Arlington, VA: a mixed-use development using internal and institutional equity and bank debt.
The Phoenix, Philadelphia, PA: a mixed-use development using institutional equity, bank and institutional debt and historic tax credit financing.
The Stegmaier at Federal Square, Wilkes-Barre, PA: a federal office project using a public bond issue based on a credit lease.

LEED/Sustainability Analyses
Most of our projects are based on the core principles of LEED certification and long term building sustainability, in part because much of our portfolio is located in both large and smaller metropolitan areas and is often designed to meet the long term and enduring needs of large institutional clients. Our experience in developing to achieve LEED certification typically results in projects that receive a level of certification beyond our client’s original goal (for example, the IRS Regional Headquarters was slated to achieve basic LEED certification and ultimately received a LEED Gold certification).
Our success can be attributed to a very knowledgeable and senior staff (many with LEED accreditation), who can quickly chart a path to achieving design phase certification, then follow with demonstrated success in the complicated construction phase audit process.
Site Environmental Analyses
Site environmental analyses are typically part of due diligence on all of our projects, in large part because most of our portfolio is situated on previously developed property. Working with our sister company (KEM) and others, we have overseen many forms of site remediation work that are required by state and local agencies as a condition of redevelopment.
Remediation activities have included, for example, removal of contaminated soil, abatement of asbestos and, in certain instances, encapsulation of contamination that will allow for redevelopment of a site. Our work has also included the development of storm water management plans that meet increasingly stringent regulatory requirements.
Some examples of this work include:

SugarHouse Casino, Philadelphia, PA: at this riverfront site, the former home of a sugar refinery, we managed the removal and in some cases, reuse of fill on this industrial site, working closely with state regulatory agencies to assure an early completion of this large remediation project.
Octavius V. Catto School & Stockton Station Park, Camden, NJ: this extraordinarily complex site environmental effort included development and management of a state and community approved plan for remediation of hazardous materials in many areas of the seventeen acre property.

Public-Private Partnership Formation
The principals of KMS have been creating public-private partnerships for nearly two decades, long before this form of project delivery became a solution of choice for many of today’s infrastructure challenges.
Our experience is rooted in the long history of the Keating Organization servicing the needs of public institutions. Beginning in the early 1980’s, we were engaged in helping colleges find creative ways to finance and deliver academic buildings and student housing; similarly, we helped hospitals finance and deliver medical office buildings.
Beginning in 1990 we began a working relationship with the United States Postal Service (USPS) and the United States General Services Administration to finance and deliver federal courthouses and office buildings on underutilized Postal Service property. In the middle 1990’s we expanded this form of partnership to include county and municipal buildings and facilities for colleges and universities.
These relationships continue to this day. We have now completed projects valued at well over $1 billion in public-private partnerships.
With each project we began with the question of how to deliver the project at the least cost of occupancy to our client, always working within their specific constraints. KMS has the experience and skills to answer this question and has consistently demonstrated an ability to work collaboratively with public partners.
Representative projects include:

IRS Regional Headquarters, Philadelphia, PA: a one million square foot facility redeveloped on USPS land.
Civic Square II, New Brunswick, NJ: a Middlesex County Administration Building, City of New Brunswick Municipal Building and renovated Post Office, mostly on USPS land.
Rutgers Public Safety Building, New Brunswick, NJ: a new public safety building, academic facilities and parking garage for Rutgers University, developed in collaboration with public partner, New Brunswick Development Corporation.

Entity Structuring
Each development project brings a unique set of challenges: entitlement, design, project cost and project finance. These challenges create risk. Furthermore, each project offers a unique set of participants with varying appetites for and ability to assume risk, particularly in the case of public partners.
The principals have used entity structuring to limit the risks on projects and assign these risks to the parties who can and should bear those risks.
Our engagement in this process has led to unique credit lease structures that have navigated federal leasing constraints, Congressional approvals and the limitations on public borrowing. These structures have also addressed the specific requirements of pension funds and municipal entities, as well as the needs of project users through capital and operating leases. We are particularly proud of an often-demonstrated ability to craft lease structures that meet the needs of our partners, matching their tolerance for risk with their role in the project.
Representative projects include:

The Phoenix at Clarendon: Arlington, VA: a privately owned and financed $110 million project developed on United States Postal Service (USPS) property.
IRS Regional Headquarters, Philadelphia, PA: a one million square foot federal office building that was redeveloped on USPS property.
Civic Square II, New Brunswick, NJ: a new county administration building, new municipal building and renovated post office, mostly on USPS land.

Yield Analyses/Master Plan
This activity is one of our earliest pre-development activities that is typically performed in house. The work can take the form of conceptual plans that internally, allow us to develop a preliminary understanding of the range of options for property development. These same plans are often used to graphically illustrate options (and value) to the property owner/prospective client.
The analyses have addressed many types of development, from plans for large tracts of land to proposals for redevelopment of a building. Many have represented the potential for mixed-use development that includes multi-family residential, retail and office space; others illustrate concepts for courthouses and government office buildings; and still others address hospitality and gaming opportunities. Visit the Keating RHA site for examples of these analyses.
Civic Engagement
This service encompasses the many ways in which the company has worked with local groups to develop a project that successfully meets both client and broader community needs. Our approach to this work is always defined by the specific requirements of the projects and interests of the community; it has, for example, included community forums to discuss project alternatives, design charrettes and regularly scheduled project reviews that are part of a more structured review and approvals process.
Examples of this engagement process include:

Octavius V. Catto School, Camden, NJ: a new demonstration school project that included many meetings with the local community to discuss the school program, new playground and park facilities and the range of programs to be provided by the new Boys & Girls Club that are part of the school complex.
The Phoenix at Clarendon, Arlington, VA: this mixed-use development of United States Postal Service Property required many rounds of meetings and charrettes with local community groups to resolve traffic, environmental, historic preservation, mix of uses and building massing/density issues.
SugarHouse Casino, Philadelphia, PA: this project became a poster child for civic engagement in Philadelphia, spanning a total of four years in the project approvals process. The company conducted dozens of official meeting s with the community, but also arranged countless smaller forums with focus on specific community issues ranging from traffic, archaeology and waterfront development approvals to jobs creation and formation of a community service district with long term support from the casino.

Historic Preservation Analyses
Our work on United States Postal Service (USPS) and other historic properties has produced a broad portfolio of experience that addresses the disposition of historic structures spanning much of the past twenty years. Many of these structures are community icons and most of them have been the subject of a Section 106 assessment that we have often directed on behalf of the USPS.
Our work on USPS and other historic properties has produced consistently successful project results that have satisfied the stringent requirement of State Historic Preservation Offices across the country (six states). We are proud of this record…it illustrates the potential to match historic preservation objectives with sound economic development. Some examples:

IRS Regional Headquarters, Philadelphia, PA
The Phoenix, Philadelphia, PA
The Phoenix at Clarendon, Arlington, VA
United States District Courthouse & Post Office, Lynchburg, VA
United States District Courthouse, Waco, TX

Transit-Oriented Development
The focus of KMS development—urban and suburban infill properties—has produced a project portfolio that is filled with transit-oriented development. Many of our project awards—the IRS Regional Headquarters and The Phoenix in Philadelphia, the Phoenix at Clarendon in Arlington, VA and Heldrich Plaza in New Brunswick, NJ—acknowledge the importance of this emphasis.
We know that many owners now value the importance of transit-oriented development experience. As the following list illustrates, we have consistently delivered that project service for much of the past twenty years.

IRS Regional Headquarters, Philadelphia, PA
The Phoenix, Philadelphia, PA
Keystone-Mercy Office Campus, Conshohocken, PA
The Phoenix at Clarendon, Arlington, VA
Arlington Road Residential, Bethesda, MD
Heldrich Plaza, New Brunswick, NJ
Transit Gateway Village, New Brunswick, NJ
Old Oakland Housing, Oakland, CA

Security Studies
Our active role in the development of government facilities—courthouses, office and public safety buildings—has made security issues a frequent focus of our work. With our early projects in the 1990’s, we developed a solid body of knowledge in the design and management of secure facilities like courthouses (now a total of nine facilities).
The advent of terrorist-related activities brought new focus and experience in this service area. We have enlarged our range of expertise and expert consultant base to include those who model the impacts of blast on structures (below, see one example of this work for the IRS Regional Headquarters), analyze the impacts of building progressive collapse, offer innovative solutions to reinforcing historic structures to withstand blast and identify creative solutions to meeting secure perimeter requirements on tight urban sites.
This accumulated knowledge positions us to address today’s complex security requirements of government, institutional and corporate clients.
Owner’s Representative Services
The company offers a broad portfolio of Owner’s Representative experience. Our success in growing this portfolio can be attributed to the signature of our service: we think, act and manage like an Owner…because we are an Owner. We are and have been in the shoes of the Owner for over two decades…and nothing makes us more aware of the Owner’s need to balance day-to-day budgetary and long term management requirements than being in that same position.
We have provided Owner’s Representative services through every phase of development, design and construction across an exceptional range of project types: mixed-use projects that blend residential, office and retail, healthcare/research facilities, university buildings—academic and administrative, secondary education and long term care facilities. Among these projects are:

Rutgers Institute for Food, Nutrition & Health, New Brunswick, NJ
Transit Gateway Village, New Brunswick, NJ
Robert Wood Johnson Wellness Plaza, New Brunswick, NJ
Child Health Institute, New Brunswick, NJ
New Brunswick High School, New Brunswick, NJ

Asset Management
As an Owner-Investor in real estate, KMS has the knowledge and experience to manage many types of assets: commercial office and retail, residential and hospitality. Our experience spans decades and more importantly, the people who manage these assets have decades of experience in every aspect of this service—from initial market positioning through finance, accounting and staffing that is sized to the needs of the property.
We customize the management plan for each property, recognizing that a focus on return objectives in the short term must typically be balanced by prudent and ongoing capital investment that reaps stronger rent rolls, lower operating costs and a healthier balance sheet over the long term.
Among the significant properties for which we provide asset management services are The Phoenix and the Hyatt Regency at Penn’s Landing in Philadelphia.
Property Management
KMS provides management services for a variety of properties, many where we were the ready and seamless transition from the development to property management role. We offer proven experience, quantifiable results and the personal service that we believe every Owner should expect from their property manager.
Our team is highly experienced in marketing, lease administration, personnel training and management, preventive and precision maintenance, timely accounting and comprehensive monthly reporting. We take particular pride in our approach to on- and off-site administrative services…they are the trademark of our personalized approach to property management.
Representative projects that we manage (totaling over two million square feet) include:

County Administration Building, New Brunswick, NJ
Public Safety Building, New Brunswick, NJ
Middlesex County Common Pleas Courthouse, New Brunswick, NJ
Middlesex County Family Courthouse, New Brunswick, NJ
Kilmer Square, New Brunswick, NJ
The Stegmaier at Federal Square, Wilkes-Barre, PA
The Phoenix, Philadelphia
 




People
Individually, the people of KMS represent decades of experience and many professional backgrounds: management, law, engineering, architecture and construction to name a few. Together, we are the nucleus of highly experienced teams that are organized to meet the specific needs of each project.


Principals:
Daniel Keating, III
Dennis Martin
Michael Sencindiver


Executives:
Robert Henderson
Terrence McKenna
Robert Reed


 
John Sisti
Robert McCulley
Karen Donnelly


 
David Millman
John Kroll
Lisa Armstrong


 




Daniel J. Keating, III
Principal
Education
Villanova University Bachelor of Science Business Administration
Dan is a well-known and successful businessman whose career spans forty years. Following some early years in his father’s construction business, he envisioned and soon formed companies that became involved in virtually every facet of real estate---construction, development and environmental management. Through his leadership, the businesses grew and prospered, including a construction company that was often ranked as one of the region’s largest.
With the transition from the construction company, Dan is now focusing his energy on a new business model. That model acknowledges the rapidly evolving need among our clients for new and better-managed services. It also taps one of the enduring strengths of a successful entrepreneur: the ability to attract and focus some of the best talent in the business on the needs of our clients.
His career is defined by achievements that merge construction and development skills, including projects like the redevelopment of the United States Postal Service property at 30th Street, the Pennsylvania Convention Center, The Phoenix, Lincoln Financial Field, SugarHouse Casino, the Hyatt Regency at Penn’s Landing and many other projects whose present day value exceeds $10 billion.
It is also defined by ideas that have transformed the way we deliver projects. In the early days it was the formation of teams that created new opportunities for disadvantaged businesses (before MBE/WBE). Later, it was streamlining the construction process through the integration of design and construction services; and along the way he promoted the formation of public-private partnerships that create new project value for all parties.
Throughout his career, Dan has remained true to his instincts: successful projects are the product of strong and enduring relationships.
Since graduating from Villanova University in the early seventies, he has served on the boards of many regional institutions and actively participated in numerous philanthropic activities. Dennis A. Martin
Principal
Education
University of Pennsylvania School of Law Juris Doctorate Colgate University Artium Baccalaureatus
Bar Admissions
Pennsylvania Bar Association New Jersey Bar Association
Dennis is an attorney, longtime counsel and partner with Dan Keating. He has worked the last thirty-five years with Dan in many capacities: as Executive Vice President and general counsel of his construction company; as lead advisor in the formation of many business ventures; and for the past twenty years, as President of the development operations.
His leadership of the development operation has produced a long list of successful projects during the past twenty-five years: the IRS Regional Headquarters at 30th Street, The Phoenix, The Phoenix at Clarendon, federal courthouses and office buildings in many locations (Lynchburg, VA, Waco, TX, Wilkes-Barre and Allentown, PA) and a variety of other projects. His ability to channel the efforts of many institutions and people representing varied and diverse interests is a key reason for the company’s success.
A hallmark of Dennis’ career is a long and successful relationship with the United States Postal Service and the United States General Services Administration (GSA). He has been asked repeatedly by these institutions to deliver projects of all sizes and types---courthouses, office buildings and mixed-use projects---within a structured finance model that meets the requirements of the GSA’s complex capital leasing rules. Dennis and his team created this model of USPS/GSA project delivery in the early 1990’s and proceeded to customize the model to fit the needs of many projects that followed.
Dennis has also managed the many and varied challenges of serving as Executive Vice President and general counsel to a large construction company for more than three decades. He has crafted many of the contracts for our large construction contracts (Pennsylvania Convention Center, Lincoln Financial Field, Rivers Casino in Pittsburgh, to name a few); helped structure the many entities that support construction, development and technology projects; and successfully managed the day-to-to-day flow of litigation that is associated with large and multi-faceted businesses.
Dennis received his undergraduate degree from Colgate University and law degree from the University of Pennsylvania. He is a member of the Bar in Pennsylvania and New Jersey. Michael V. Sencindiver
Principal
Education
The Dickinson School of Law, Juris Doctorate Juniata College, Bachelor of Arts, Law
Bar Admissions
Pennsylvania Bar Association New Jersey Bar Association
Mike is a lawyer and real estate professional with over thirty years of experience. He began his career with a local law firm and then moved on to become a partner in a national real estate development company. During his tenure with that company, Mike developed some of the Philadelphia’s memorable buildings, including the Independence Blue Cross headquarters building.
These early achievements set the stage for some of our (and this region’s) most creative real estate transactions. Fifteen years ago, Mike began work on our first public-private partnership transaction with the New Brunswick Development Corporation (DEVCO) and the United States Postal Service (USPS) to develop new administrative, courts and post office space for the County of Middlesex, City of New Brunswick and the USPS. The success of that project and the many new relationships that he cultivated have led to many and varied projects since that time, including more courthouses, office buildings, classrooms and major mixed-use developments including the Heldrich Center and the Gateway/Transit Village. With total project value now approaching one billion dollars, the transformation of Downtown New Brunswick is remarkable. It is also testimony, in part, to the skills and vision that Mike brought to the projects.
Mike has also led some of our significant new development in and around the Philadelphia region during the past twenty years, including the Hyatt Regency at Penns Landing, the first major private development within this sector of the City’s waterfront along the Delaware River.
Working with the private land owners and the Borough of Conshohocken, he was responsible for the transformation of a fourteen acre Brownfields parcel at the Borough’s gateway. The project resulted in well over a quarter million square feet of office space and a large multi-family residential development.
Mike is well-known in the Philadelphia real estate community and has served his local community in many capacities throughout his career. He received a law degree from Dickinson Law School and undergraduate degree from Juniata College. Robert H. Henderson
Director of Pre-Construction
Education
University of Pennsylvania Master of Architecture Master of City Planning L’Ecole de Beaux Arts, Foutainebleau, France Courses in Architecture University of Illinois Bachelor of Architecture
Professional Status
Registered Architect NCARB
Affiliations
American Institute of Architects Registered Architect NCARB Urban Land Institute National Trust for Historic Preservation
Bob is an architect and planner whose forty-year career has been shaped by an exceptionally broad range of project experience in master planning, program development, building design and project management.
The past twenty years he has served as Executive Architect and design advisor to the many Keating projects and interests, setting the stage for, and guiding the planning/design process from “idea” to project completion. He has developed innumerable conceptual plans for commercial, institutional, residential and mixed-use development of virtually all types, all directed at gauging the initial feasibility and viability of an idea. And as the follow on to this process, he has hired and formed dozens of relationships with architects, engineers and consultants in many fields.
Bob has also become extremely familiar with the world of project entitlement and approval. On the one hand, he has engaged consultants from many fields of expertise---market analysis, historic preservation, program development and analysis, lighting design, site/building security, acoustics, food service, and many more---to meet the ever more rigorous requirements of the land/ project entitlement process. On the other, he has developed a keen sense of how to navigate the many layers of project approval and perhaps more importantly, how to distill a mix of competing ideas and interests into an achievable plan that advances a project.
The early years of his career, Bob worked with Skidmore, Owings and Merrill on various building and urban planning assignments that gave him a solid understanding of the large public/institutional design and approvals process. He then spent more than a decade as partner in a local architectural practice that developed expertise in transportation facilities, justice facilities and private commercial development.
Bob completed undergraduate studies at the University of Illinois and the E’cole desBeaux-Arts. He holds graduate degrees in Architecture and City Planning from the University of Pennsylvania. He is a registered architect and member of the Urban Land Institute. Terrence J. McKenna
Project Executive
Education
University of Dayton Bachelor of Science Civil Engineering
Professional Status
Licensed Professional Engineer, Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware
Affiliations
Upper Providence Township, Montgomery County, PA Zoning Hearing Board Member National Society of Professional Engineers Member
Terry is an engineer with nearly twenty years of experience providing consulting, construction management and real estate development services in both the public and private sectors.
His project management skills have been well-honed on some of the region’s most complex projects. These projects mark his experience with managing the entitlement process and building relationships at all levels of government. In short, he has an impressive record of providing development and construction phase services that keep our client’s projects on track.
One significant project benchmark for Terry has been the successful management of the SugarHouse Casino approval process in Philadelphia (our client and others have noted that “...if you can navigate the approval of SugarHouse, everything else is easy”). He directed an internal site selection and approval process that led to state selection of the site, and then led a long and contentious local entitlement process that ultimately resulted in approvals from agencies at all levels of government and a highly successful project for our client and the City.
Terry’s portfolio of satisfied clients includes nationwide home builders, health care providers, hospitality and gaming companies, utilities, major financial institutions, colleges and universities and a number of private developers. His knowledge of the environmental field---from regulations that frame the range of actions through a sound plan of execution---has produced many repeat clients.
Earlier in his career, Terry lead many of the environmental consulting projects at Keating Environmental Management (KEM). While working at KEM, and before that at a Fortune 500 construction and real estate development company, he developed an unparalleled knowledge of Brownfields site redevelopment. That knowledge has produced very real value for many of our clients.
Terry has a degree in civil engineering from the University of Dayton. He is a registered professional engineer in several states and has held seats on various boards in his community. Robert C. Reed, P.E., LEED AP
Development Executive
Education
The Pennsylvania State University Bachelor of Science Mechanical Engineering
Professional Status
Licensed Professional Engineer, Pennsylvania
Affiliations
American Society of Mechanical Engineers
Rob is an engineer with twenty-five years of public and private sector experience in real estate development and construction management. He has planned, managed and delivered some of the largest projects in the Philadelphia region, including the highly acclaimed conversion of the 30th Street Post Office to the new $300 million IRS Regional Headquarters.
A signature of Rob’s work is the ability to effectively manage the interests of Owners, Consultants and Contractors on large and complex projects, balancing many competing requirements while meeting demanding project schedules and budgets.
Rob has worked with Keating companies for fifteen years. Along the way, he has demonstrated a unique ability to deliver projects that have required both development and construction management skills. His knowledge of development cost models and the project entitlement strategies is as well-honed as the experience he has in organizing, managing and closing out a construction site.
Prior to joining Keating, Rob spent ten years with the United States General Services Administration and the United States Corps of Engineers, managing many of their larger construction projects in the Middle Atlantic Region. John D. Sisti, P.E., P.P.
Senior Project Executive
Education
Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute Master of Science Civil Engineering Rutgers College of Engineering Magna Cum Laude Bachelor of Science Civil Engineering
Professional Status
Licensed Professional Engineer, New Jersey Licensed Professional Planner, New Jersey
Affiliations
American Society of Civil Engineers The National Engineering Honor Society, Tau Beta Pi The National Civil Engineering Honor Society Chi Epsilon
Continuing Education
LEED Green Associate Qualification Certificate: Green Building Principles
John is a licensed professional engineer and planner with an exceptional portfolio of project management experience, much of it in central and northern New Jersey. With over thirty years of experience, his projects include some of the region’s most complex mixed-use developments, like The Child Health Institute of New Jersey, Gateway Transit Village, Heldrich Plaza, the New Brunswick Wellness Plaza, the New Brunswick High School and the Mercer County Arena in Trenton, NJ.
Throughout his career, John’s trademark has been attention to the innumerable details that define large projects. This attention to detail is a key reason that the dozens of projects that he has managed are successfully completed on time and within the owner’s budget. John’s range of project experience --- from early entitlement of development through construction project closeout -- has been an excellent fit with the needs of our clients and has resulted in many repeat assignments.
John’s resume includes numerous projects where he performed successfully as the Owner’s Representative. For the last 10 years with KMS and its successor, John has performed solely in an Owner’s Representative capacity. Robert McCulley
Project Executive
Education
Rutgers University Bachelor of Science Civil Engineering
Continuing Education and Graduate Courses
Advanced Construction Management Construction Claims and Law Cost Estimating and Bidding
Bob is a seasoned project executive who has managed a wide variety of projects, including Gateway Transit Village, the Child Health Institute, the Middlesex County Criminal Courthouse and Heldrich Plaza, all in New Brunswick, NJ. With over thirty years of experience, his project portfolio includes management of both development and construction services.
His range of project management skills includes many project types: public and private, governmental and residential, large and small. This range of experience has honed his ability to meet the demanding requirements for both quick and accurate responses to owner needs.
Bob is a graduate of the Rutgers University Civil Engineering program. He has additional advance coursework in fields such as Advanced Construction Management and Construction Claims and Law.
Bob’s resume includes numerous projects where he performed successfully as the owner’s representative. For the last 10+ years with KMS and its successor, Bob has performed solely in an Owner’s Representative capacity on the following projects. Each of these projects included some of the critical elements of the New Jersey Institute for Food Nutrition & Health. Karen Donnelly
Director of Asset Management
Education
Villanova University MBA, College of Commerce and FinanceDuke University Bachelor of Arts American Literature
As Director of Asset Management/Property Management, Karen brings over 20 years’ of experience in leasing, property management and asset management to the team. Serving clients in both the public and private sector, Karen specializes in improving challenging assets via market positioning, operating efficiency and capital restructuring.
During her 17 years with KMS, Karen has been responsible for the financial and operating performance of a $300 million portfolio which included over 1 million square feet of commercial product in Pennsylvania and New Jersey as well as 1,000 apartment units located in Pennsylvania, Arizona, Texas and Florida. She has built long-term relationships with institutional and corporate clients through exceptional service and quantifiable results. Her current portfolio includes management of the 400,000 SF Civic Square courthouse and office development for the County of Middlesex, NJ; Rutgers University Public Safety Building; and the Stegmaier Building, a federal office building occupied by the GSA and USPS in Wilkes-Barre, PA. Karen has extensive experience in lease negotiation, financial analysis, annual budgeting and reporting, as well as oversight of capital and tenant improvement projects.
Prior to joining KMS, Karen was property manager and leasing agent with Jackson-Cross Company (now CB Richard Ellis) and The Linpro Company in Philadelphia and the neighboring suburbs. She was responsible for the management and leasing of One Penn Square West, a 260,000 SF 25-story high-rise office building; Prudential Business Campus, a 1.0 million SF office/ flex complex and Berwyn Park, a 400,000 SF office campus. David Millman
Development Executive
Education
The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania
Master of Business Administration
Massachusetts Institute of Technology
Master of Science in Ocean Engineering
Bachelor of Science in Ocean Engineering
Professional Status
Licensed Professional Engineer, Pennsylvania and California
Affiliations
Member, American Society of Civil Engineers
David is licensed professional engineer and MBA with extensive experience in program management, project development, environmental construction/ remediation and structural design that spans three decades.
David has served as the Owner’s Representative and Project Manager for one of the firm’s signature projects, the Octavius V. Catto Community School and Boys & Girls Club of Camden County Demonstration Project in Camden, NJ. This $80 million, 40-acre redevelopment project required an extensive range of services that David managed from inception to completion, including: oversight of funding from the New Jersey Schools Development Authority and other private and public sources; entitlement of the required land via eminent domain, negotiation and leasing; design and construction of the new 95,000 square foot Catto elementary school for 540 students and the adjacent 25,000 square foot Boys & Girls Club serving 250 children per day; refurbishment of the existing 11-acre Dudley Grange Park; management of the Pleasant Gardens Apartments apartment complex and subsequent relocation of 240 resident families to other suitable housing; demolition of the apartment complex and remediation of the contaminated soil beneath the apartment complex; design and construction of the new 14-acre Stockton Station Park on the site of the former apartment complex; and the design and construction of a new greenway and bike/jogging path connecting the new park to the school and refurbished park.
Prior to joining KMS David was a Principal at a project development, program management and financial consulting firm for six years. Earlier in his career David managed a 60-person operating unit of a $280 million private environmental consulting, construction and engineering firm that provided general contacting, design/build and operations and maintenance services for large public infrastructure projects. He also led design efforts for numerous fixed, deep water, offshore drilling and production platforms. John Kroll
Director of Residential Property Management
Education
Rochester Institute of Technology
John is a 30-year hospitality and property manager veteran who maintained a distinguished professional career for 25 years with Hyatt Hotels Corporation. He has managed multiple hotels, both union and non-union, with up to 1400 guestrooms, encompassing 1100 associates and managing revenues exceeding $100 million. Transitioned from operations to asset and facility management while pursuing the development of new hotels and both residential and commercial projects. John has personally been responsible for and has managed properties ranging in size from 325,000 to 1,000,000 square feet.
From 2007 to the present, John has been responsible for the overall operations of The Phoenix, a 600,000 square foot mixed-use facility. Responsibilities include facility management, construction, marketing, leasing/ sales of 267 condominiums, two restaurants, commercial tenants on four levels, Salon & Spa and valet parking operations. President of the Master Condominium Board and also presided over the Residential and Commercial Condominium Boards. Condominium dues have not been increased in five years at The Phoenix, strong payroll and expense control contribute to the success as well as a strategic and successful yearly RFP process. Revenue generating is also a strategic initiative to offset expenses.
John is actively involved as a member in both civic and community activities. Appointed by the Governor in 2011 John has served on the Pennsylvania Convention Center Authority, which is the governing body of the Pennsylvania Convention Center. In 2009, John was awarded the Multicultural Affairs Congress – Industry Leader of the Year. He has been the recipient of many awards for his leadership skills and contributions to society, such as from
the Cradle of Liberty - Hospitality Leader of the Year Award, the Paul Harris Fellowship Award from Rotary International – Highest Volunteer Award; the Corporate Volunteer of the Year Award from Mercer Medical Society, and the Elwyn’s Crystal Award for non-profit fundraising efforts. Additional, John has served and is serving as Vice Chairman – Multi-Cultural Affairs Congress 2002 – 2012 and on the following Board of Directors: Philadelphia Chamber of Commerce 2006-2008, Arthur Ashe Youth Tennis & Education 2001-2012, African American Museum 2005-2011, Temple University Hotel & Hospitality Management 2004 - 2012, Philadelphia Marketing Corporation HIC 2001- 2012 and Eden Institute a nationally recognized Institute providing lifespan services for individuals with Autism 1994-2010.
John has been and continues to be a strong leader in his profession and an active participant in the community. Lisa J. Armstrong, AIA, LEED AP BD & C
Development Executive
Education
University of Pennsylvania Master of Architecture Oxford University Honours Bachelor of Arts in Philosophy, Politics, and Economics University of Pennsylvania Wharton School Cum Laude Bachelor of Science in Economics University of Pennsylvania Cum Laude Bachelor of Arts in Design of the Environment
Professional Status
Registered Architect, Pennsylvania Registered Architect NCARB LEED AP BD & C
Professional Affiliations
American Institute of Architects
Lisa is an architect with twenty-five years of project development, design, and sustainable strategy planning experience. She approaches each project with a multi-disciplinary perspective, seeking project solutions that maximize energy efficiency, satisfy long term sustainability objectives and achieve LEED certification. Her clients include property owners, developers, builders and design professionals. Her construction coordination experience is extensive – working on the job site during construction as the owner’s representative is one of her professional strengths.
Lisa joined the Keating Companies in 2007 as a Development Manager for the IRS Regional Headquarters project. For this $300 million redevelopment of the historic one million square foot 30th Street Main Post Office, Lisa was responsible for managing the LEED certification process, tracking and facilitating the certification efforts required of the design, construction, and owner team. The project surpassed the User’s project requirement for LEED certification by earning USGBC approval of Gold Certification. The project required many approvals by stakeholders such as the City of Philadelphia, PennDOT, and Amtrak, and Lisa lead the submission and permit approvals process with all of these stakeholders.
Lisa is currently leading a comprehensive LEED Existing Building Operations and Maintenance Certification Evaluation for the Hyatt Regency at Penn’s Landing. Integrated with the LEED evaluation is an energy audit. The Hyatt does not meet the LEED prerequisite Energy Star rating of 69. In response, a micro-turbine co-generation system has been designed to improve the Hyatt’s energy performance and enable the pursuit of LEED certification for the property owners.
Lisa has been a strong proponent of sustainable design throughout her career. Her architecture firm was responsible for the design of environmentally sustainable exterior public spaces, multi-use community facilities, early childhood education centers and affordable housing in Philadelphia. Much of this work focused on the adaptive reuse of historic structures and sites.
Lisa taught at Temple University in the Architecture Department as an Adjunct Assistant Professor, where she brought significant focus to sustainable design issues. Earlier, she was awarded a fellowship by the Henry Luce Foundation to be a designer with the Royal Thai Architects in Bangkok, Thailand. She also was a recipient of a Thouron Award from the University of Pennsylvania. This scholarship fully funded two years of study at Oxford University.
Lisa is an active volunteer in her local Center City Philadelphia community, co- chairing the Greening Greenfield project for the last six years. 
 





Government & Corporate Office
Courthouses
Hospitality
Education
Residential
Healthcare
Mixed-Use Development
Public Infrastructure



Project Portfolio
The KMS project portfolio is exceptionally diverse, highlighting an important attribute of the partnership: a time-tested and solution-oriented approach to meeting the needs of our clients, whether for office, institutional, residential or mixed-use development. Click any of the development sectors and see how they vary in size, type, location and delivery method.



 


IRS Regional Headquarters
LocationPhiladelphia, PA
Owner/DeveloperBrandywine Realty Trust; Keating Development Company
ArchitectBohlin Cywinski Jackson; Pelli Clarke Pelli & Associates
Project Scope:Initially, to develop a comprehensive plan for redevelopment of a 24-acre United States Postal Service (USPS) property, including planning, market and economic analyses that resulted in a site redevelopment plan encompassing a nearly one million square foot conversion of the Main Post Office to the IRS Regional Headquarters; a 1,650-space parking garage located on the site of the former Postal Service Annex; and a new USPS retail and mail operations and distribution facility within an existing USPS garage. Overall development totaled nearly two million square feet. Services:
							Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Entity Structuring, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, LEED/Sustainability Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Transit-Oriented Development, Security Studies, 











Civic Square II
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation; Keating Development Company
ArchitectRothe Johnson Associates
Project Scope:This initial phase of the Civic Square redevelopment project for Downtown New Brunswick became the template for many projects that followed in that city and other parts of the country; in public- private partnership with the New Brunswick Development Corporation, conceived and implemented a concept for redevelopment of land owned by Middlesex County and the United States Postal Service that included a 110,000 square foot County Administration Building, a 113,000 square foot mixed- use development that includes City and County offices and courtrooms, a two-level below grade parking structure and restoration of an historic Post Office that was converted to a retail-only facility. Services:
							Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Security Studies, Property Management, 









The Stegmaier at Federal Square
LocationWilkes-Barre, PA
Owner/DeveloperUnited States Postal Service; Keating Development Company
ArchitectBohlin Cywinski Jackson
Project Scope:Development on behalf of the United States Postal Service and the United States General Services Administration for this historic property in Downtown Wilkes-Barre; scope included a detailed site and building analysis that led to a plan for reuse of the brewery building (a City icon) and construction of an addition, creating a 115,000 square foot, multi-tenant federal office building; the project scope also included structural stabilization of an adjacent power plant shell and 250 surface parking spaces. Services:
							Site Due Diligence, Project Finance, Site Environmental Analyses, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Property Management, 








The Phoenix at Clarendon
LocationArlington, VA
Owner/DeveloperKeating Clarendon Development, LLC
ArchitectDorsky Hodgson Partners
Project Scope:Working with the United States Postal Service (USPS), conceived and implemented a major new mixed- use development for a two-block property located adjacent to the Clarendon Station in the vibrant Rosslyn-Ballston Metro corridor. The product of this effort was a 40,000 square foot USPS retail and mail processing/distribution unit, with all but the retail operation located below grade; and private uses including181 residential condominium units, 65,000 square feet of office condominiums, 20,000 square feet of retail storefront and four levels (525 spaces) of below grade parking. Overall development totals nearly 500,000 square feet. Services:
							Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Transit-Oriented Development, 










United States District Courthouse
LocationLynchburg, VA
Owner/DeveloperUnited States Postal Service; Keating Development Company
ArchitectMGA Partners
Project Scope:Working on behalf of the General Services Administration and the United States Postal Service (USPS),initially identified a new downtown site for a combined courthouse and post office that would offer the security, parking and convenience lacking in each of the separate existing buildings; performed site due diligence and negotiated agreement with the City to acquire a full city block that was partially occupied by an historic school structure, leading to a plan for an 80,000 square foot courthouse that included a new five-story structure connecting to an extensively renovated school structure; in addition, the scope included a new 6,500 square foot post office, located at the opposite end of the block in a separate structure, and surface parking for both the courts and post office. Services:
							Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Security Studies, 









United States District Courthouse
LocationWaco, TX
Owner/DeveloperUnited States Postal Service; Keating Development Company
Architect3D International, Inc.
Project Scope:Working on behalf of the General Services Administration and United States Postal Service, managed the development of a plan to upgrade and expand this classic Mission-Style structure that totals 82,000 square feet (including a two-story, 30,000 square foot addition; existing historic courtrooms and judicial chambers were restored, along with the main entry lobby that was the former entry to the post office; security features included enclosed parking and sallyport, as well as fencing and gated access that created a secure site perimeter. The scope also included identification of a building that could be converted to a temporary courts facility, leading to design and fit-out of this space with courtrooms, detention facilities and offices that were the temporary home of the Courts while the historic structure was renovated. Services:
							Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Site Environmental Analyses, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Security Studies, 











United States District Courthouse
LocationAllentown, PA
Owner/DeveloperKeating Development Company
ArchitectThe Sheward Partnership
Project Scope:Working on behalf of the United States Postal Service (USPS), developed a 90,000 square foot federal courthouse and office building; the four-story structure is located on a prominent corner of Allentown’s government center and was the company’s initial collaboration with the USPS and the United States General Services Administration; the project includes three courtrooms, U.S. Marshals Service offices, secure parking for judges and various courts-related administrative space; was the result of the parallel development of new federal office space at The Stegmaier at Federal Square, where the USPS and other. Services:
							Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Security Studies, 








Max Rosenn Federal Courthouse
LocationWilkes-Barre, PA
Owner/DeveloperUnited States Postal Service; Keating Development Company
ArchitectKling Lindquist Partnership
Project Scope:Working on behalf of the United States Postal Service (USPS), the company developed a concept for the restoration and expansion of this historic post office structure in Downtown Wilkes-Barre; the development included restoration and reorganization of existing courtroom space in the 75,000 square foot building, along with a 14,000 square foot expansion to house a secure U.S. Marshals Service office; the ability to achieve the much-needed expansion and reorganization of the space was the result of the parallel development of new federal office space in The Stegmaier Federal Building, where USPS and other federal agencies were relocated from this building. Services:
							Public-Private Partnership, Historic Preservation, Security, Environmental, 








Middlesex County Common Pleas Courthouse
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation; Keating Development Company
ArchitectFarewell Mills & Gatsch
Project Scope:In public-private partnership with the New Brunswick Development Corporation renovated and reconfigured the existing 242,000 square foot courthouse that is part of the multi-phased Civic Square redevelopment; the project included a complete building security upgrade, including a new and more secure public entry; and upgraded and more efficient HVAC system; a new and contemporary building entry façade; and a comprehensive renovation of 30+ courtrooms and judicial chamber suites. Services:
							Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Security Studies, Property Management, 








Middlesex County Family Courthouse
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation
ArchitectFarewell Mills & Gatsch
Project Scope:Working with the New Brunswick Development Corporation and the New Brunswick Parking Authority in a public-private partnership, prepared a concept for redevelopment of a city block in Downtown New Brunswick that combined a new four-story Family Courthouse totaling 100,000 square feet with an adjacent 500-space parking garage designed to accommodate ground floor retail of approximately 10,000 square feet.; the project was part of the multi-phased Civic Square development; the courthouse scope included one floor of courts administration space that can be converted to courtrooms as future growth warrants. Services:
							Site Due Diligence, Project Finance, Site Environmental Analyses, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Security Studies, Property Management, 








Hyatt Regency at Penn's Landing
LocationPhiladelphia, PA
Owner/DeveloperKeating Development Company
ArchitectBrennan Beer Gorman
Project Scope:Development of a new hotel on Philadelphia’s Delaware River waterfront, the first major private project to be completed on the City’s Penn’s Landing property; the project includes a 360-room hotel, meeting and ballroom facilities totaling 25,000 square feet, a 200-seat restaurant and other full-service hotel amenities and a 450-space garage that is connected to the hotel. Services:
							Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Site Environmental Analyses, Entity Structuring, Community Engagement, Asset Management, 








Heldrich Plaza
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation; Keating Development Company
ArchitectJames R. McAuliffe, AIA
Project Scope:Assembly and redevelopment of a 1.8 acre parcel at the cultural center of downtown New Brunswick; development and implementation of a plan for a 365,000 square foot hotel, conference center and luxury condominium mixed use urban redevelopment project. The project includes a 250-room hotel, a 50,000 square foot executive conference center with 500 seat ballroom, 250 seat amphitheater, 20 conference/meeting rooms, a board room and 48 luxury condominiums. Also included are The John H. Heldrich Center for Workforce Development, the nation’s first university-based institute devoted to transforming the complex system of workforce development at the local, state and federal levels, as well as retail space including two restaurants and retail stores. The project also incorporates a new public plaza, the symbolic cultural center of the City, as well as below grade parking for the complex. Services:
							Entity Structuring, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Transit-Oriented Development, 










Octavius V. Catto School and Boys & Girls Club
LocationCamden, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Jersey Schools Development Authority; Universal/Keating
ArchitectThe Hillier Group
Project Scope:The team was competitively selected by the State of New Jersey to provide a turnkey delivery of a demonstration school in East Camden; our demonstration proposal combined a new elementary school (Octavius V. Catto) totaling 95,000 square feet with a new 25,000 square foot Boys & Girls Club of East Camden and a ten-acre park; this unique combination couples the typical building program for an elementary school to the many new programs of a Boys & Girls Club to produce a facility offering an extended day of children's activities that is unmatched by any school of this size. Services:
							Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Civic Engagement, Owner’s Representative Services, 










Heldrich Plaza
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation; Keating Development Company
ArchitectJames R. McAuliffe, AIA
Project Scope:Assembly and redevelopment of a 1.8 acre parcel at the cultural center of downtown New Brunswick; development and implementation of a plan for a 365,000 square foot hotel, conference center and luxury condominium mixed use urban redevelopment project. The project includes a 250-room hotel, a 50,000 square foot executive conference center with 500 seat ballroom, 250 seat amphitheater, 20 conference/meeting rooms, a board room and 48 luxury condominiums. Also included are The John H. Heldrich Center for Workforce Development, the nation’s first university-based institute devoted to transforming the complex system of workforce development at the local, state and federal levels, as well as retail space including two restaurants and retail stores. The project also incorporates a new public plaza, the symbolic cultural center of the City, as well as below grade parking for the complex. Services:
							Entity Structuring, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Transit-Oriented Development, 










New Brunswick High School
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperEducational Facilities, LLC
ArchitectVitetta
Project Scope:a new 400,000 square foot high school that was developed as part of the New Jersey Demonstration School program. This model school features state-of-the-art technology in the classrooms, as well as in management of all the building systems: power, security and temperature control. It also features many community services, from learning to recreational.  The school is located on a former industrial site, requiring demolition of five manufacturing buildings, significant asbestos abatement and removal of contaminated concrete. Services:
							Site Due Diligence, Site Environmental Analyses, Owner’s Representative Services, 












Institute for Food, Nutrition & Health
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperRutgers The State University of New Jersey
ArchitectBallinger
Project Scope:This building will house the University’s newest Institute, a multi-disciplinary team of faculty focused on ways to improve nutrition; the 60,000 square foot structure houses a broad mix of uses: research labs, dining facilities, student health/clinical services facility, conference center, a pre-school and administrative offices; the building is slated to be LEED Gold certified. Services:
							LEED/Sustainability, Owner’s Representative, 









Rutgers Public Safety Building
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperRutgers The State University of New Jersey, New Brunswick Development Corportion
ArchitectFord Farewell Mills & Gatsch
Project Scope:This project includes a mix of security offices and administrative space for the University, as well as an attached 341 space parking garage; the 75,000 square foot office structure is in scale with other buildings on George Street, while the larger garage fronts buildings of similar size on Commercial Avenue. Services:
							Site Due Diligence, Site Environmental, Public-Private Partnership, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses, Security Services, 









The Phoenix
LocationPhiladelphia, PA
Owner/DeveloperSAS-1600 Arch LP; Keating Development Company
ArchitectBLT Architects
Project Scope:Conversion of a 560,000 square foot single tenant office building to a mixed-use development that includes 267 residential units, 60,000 square feet of retail and office space and 150 parking spaces; the building, located above one of the region’s commuter rail hubs, is listed with “landmark” status on the National Register, which led to a comprehensive and meticulous upgrade of the structure, including: restoration of the main entry hall and Arch Street entry/elevator lobby, the two-story atrium that joins the entries, the window and door bronze work and virtually all of the other remaining historic building fabric. Services:
							Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Historic Preservation Analyses, Transit-Oriented Development, Property Management, 










The Phoenix at Clarendon
LocationArlington, VA
Owner/DeveloperKeating Clarendon Development, LLC
ArchitectDorsky Hodgson Partners
Project Scope:Working with the United States Postal Service (USPS), conceived and implemented a major new mixed- use development for a two-block property located adjacent to the Clarendon Station in the vibrant Rosslyn-Ballston Metro corridor. The product of this effort was a 40,000 square foot USPS retail and mail processing/distribution unit, with all but the retail operation located below grade; and private uses including181 residential condominium units, 65,000 square feet of office condominiums, 20,000 square feet of retail storefront and four levels (525 spaces) of below grade parking. Overall development totals nearly 500,000 square feet. Services:
							Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Transit-Oriented Development, 










Rutgers University Square Housing
LocationNewark, NJ
Owner/DeveloperRutgers The State University of New Jersey
ArchitectDavis Brody Bond, LLP
Project Scope:A 230,000 square foot student housing complex designed for undergraduate students at the Rutgers Newark Campus; the 13-story concrete frame structure houses 600 students in 156 suites: the complex also includes a variety of amenities such as ground floor retail, multi-purpose rooms, study lounges and computer labs.							Services:









Heldrich Plaza
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation; Keating Development Company
ArchitectJames R. McAuliffe, AIA
Project Scope:Assembly and redevelopment of a 1.8 acre parcel at the cultural center of downtown New Brunswick; development and implementation of a plan for a 365,000 square foot hotel, conference center and luxury condominium mixed use urban redevelopment project. The project includes a 250-room hotel, a 50,000 square foot executive conference center with 500 seat ballroom, 250 seat amphitheater, 20 conference/meeting rooms, a board room and 48 luxury condominiums. Also included are The John H. Heldrich Center for Workforce Development, the nation’s first university-based institute devoted to transforming the complex system of workforce development at the local, state and federal levels, as well as retail space including two restaurants and retail stores. The project also incorporates a new public plaza, the symbolic cultural center of the City, as well as below grade parking for the complex. Services:
							Entity Structuring, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Transit-Oriented Development, 










Gateway Transit Village
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperSomerset Street Urban Renewal Associates, LLC; New Brunswick Parking Authority; Rutgers University
ArchitectMeltzer/Mandl Architects, PC
Project Scope:A 627,000 square foot mixed-use development, including a 200-unit, fifteen story residential use, a 150,000 square foot book store, a 62,500 square foot office structure, 15,000 square feet of restaurant/retail space and a 656 space parking structure. Services:
							Owner’s Representative Services, Transit-Oriented Development, Site Due Diligence, 








RWJ Wellness Center
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Parking Authority; Robert Wood Johnson Fitness & Wellness Center
ArchitectPS&S; Jamel/Kizel Architects & Engineers
Project Scope:Owner’s Representative for this 625,000 square foot mixed-use development that includes a 50,000 square foot Fresh Grocer store, a 62,000 square foot fitness center and a 1,275-space parking garage. Services:
							Site Environmental Analyses, Site Due Diligence, Owner’s Representative Services, 








Child Health Institute
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperChild Health Institute, LLC
ArchitectThe Hillier Group
Project Scope:Owner’s Representative for this 154,000 square foot biomedical research facility that includes 54,000 square feet of laboratory research space, a 21,000 square foot vivarium and 45,000 square feet of clinical research space; the facility is located on the campus of UMDMJ-Robert Wood Johnson Medical School. Services:
							Site Due Diligence, Site Environmental Analyses, Owner’s Representative Services, 










The Phoenix
LocationPhiladelphia, PA
Owner/DeveloperSAS-1600 Arch LP; Keating Development Company
ArchitectBLT Architects
Project Scope:Conversion of a 560,000 square foot single tenant office building to a mixed-use development that includes 267 residential units, 60,000 square feet of retail and office space and 150 parking spaces; the building, located above one of the region’s commuter rail hubs, is listed with “landmark” status on the National Register, which led to a comprehensive and meticulous upgrade of the structure, including: restoration of the main entry hall and Arch Street entry/elevator lobby, the two-story atrium that joins the entries, the window and door bronze work and virtually all of the other remaining historic building fabric. Services:
							Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Historic Preservation Analyses, Transit-Oriented Development, Property Management, 










The Phoenix at Clarendon
LocationArlington, VA
Owner/DeveloperKeating Clarendon Development, LLC
ArchitectDorsky Hodgson Partners
Project Scope:Working with the United States Postal Service (USPS), conceived and implemented a major new mixed- use development for a two-block property located adjacent to the Clarendon Station in the vibrant Rosslyn-Ballston Metro corridor. The product of this effort was a 40,000 square foot USPS retail and mail processing/distribution unit, with all but the retail operation located below grade; and private uses including181 residential condominium units, 65,000 square feet of office condominiums, 20,000 square feet of retail storefront and four levels (525 spaces) of below grade parking. Overall development totals nearly 500,000 square feet. Services:
							Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Transit-Oriented Development, 










Heldrich Plaza
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation; Keating Development Company
ArchitectJames R. McAuliffe, AIA
Project Scope:Assembly and redevelopment of a 1.8 acre parcel at the cultural center of downtown New Brunswick; development and implementation of a plan for a 365,000 square foot hotel, conference center and luxury condominium mixed use urban redevelopment project. The project includes a 250-room hotel, a 50,000 square foot executive conference center with 500 seat ballroom, 250 seat amphitheater, 20 conference/meeting rooms, a board room and 48 luxury condominiums. Also included are The John H. Heldrich Center for Workforce Development, the nation’s first university-based institute devoted to transforming the complex system of workforce development at the local, state and federal levels, as well as retail space including two restaurants and retail stores. The project also incorporates a new public plaza, the symbolic cultural center of the City, as well as below grade parking for the complex. Services:
							Entity Structuring, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Site Environmental Analyses, Project Finance, Site Due Diligence, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Transit-Oriented Development, 










Gateway Transit Village
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperSomerset Street Urban Renewal Associates, LLC; New Brunswick Parking Authority; Rutgers University
ArchitectMeltzer/Mandl Architects, PC
Project Scope:Owner’s Representative for this 627,000 square foot mixed-use development project that includes a 200-unit fifteen story apartment complex, a 15,000 square foot Barnes & Noble bookstore for Rutgers University, 62,500 square feet of office space, 15,000 square feet of restaurant/retail space and a 650-space parking garage. Services:
							Owner’s Representative Services, Transit-Oriented Development, Site Due Diligence, 








Main Post Office
LocationLynchburg, VA
Owner/DeveloperUnited States Postal Service; Keating Development Company
ArchitectMGA Partners
Project Scope:Working on behalf of the General Services Administration and the United States Postal Service (USPS),initially identified a new downtown site for a combined courthouse and post office that would offer the security, parking and convenience lacking in each of the separate existing buildings; performed site due diligence and negotiated agreement with the City to acquire a full city block that was partially occupied by an historic school structure, leading to a plan for an 80,000 square foot courthouse that included a new five-story structure connecting to an extensively renovated school structure; in addition, the scope included a new 6,500 square foot post office, located at the opposite end of the block in a separate structure, and surface parking for both the courts and post office. Services:
							Site Due Diligence, Project Finance, Site Environmental Analyses, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Security Studies, 








Main Post Office
LocationNew Brunswick, NJ
Owner/DeveloperNew Brunswick Development Corporation; Keating Development Company
ArchitectRothe Johnson Associates  
Project Scope:This initial phase of the Civic Square redevelopment project for Downtown New Brunswick became the template for many projects that followed in that city and other parts of the country; in public- private partnership with the New Brunswick Development Corporation, conceived and implemented a concept for redevelopment of land owned by Middlesex County and the United States Postal Service that included a 110,000 square foot County Administration Building, a 113,000 square foot mixed- use development that includes City and County offices and courtrooms, a two-level below grade parking structure and restoration of an historic Post Office that was converted to a retail-only facility. Services:
							Site Due Diligence, Project Finance, Site Environmental Analyses, Public-Private Partnership Formation, Entity Structuring, Yield Analyses/Master Plan, Civic Engagement, Historic Preservation Analyses, Security Studies, Property Management, 














 


Contact
Marcia S. Kelly
KMS Development Partners LP The Phoenix, Suite 203 1600 Arch StreetPhiladelphia, PA 19103
267.232.5700 P 267.232.5799 Fmkelly@kmsdev.com 

 









	Keating, Terrence J, 506-693-5854, 263 Douglas Ave, Saint John, New Brunswick, Phone Pages




























   



Sign In
                
           
                
             | 
            Register












Business Search
Reverse Lookup
People Search









































 Review a Business | Advertise | 1.888.984.1934







OttawaChange City







New BrunswickSaint JohnOperators or Apartment BuildingsKeating, Terrence J

























                        	Keating, Terrence J
                            
























0 out of 5



		                          Based on 0 reviews
                                  




Review Keating, Terrence J













					Address:



					263 Douglas Ave
Saint John, 
					New Brunswick,
					E2K 1E5







					 Phone:

					 506-693-5854
					 



























Share Keating, Terrence J:



























 Keating, Terrence J profile has been viewed 1521 times.
                            























About Keating, Terrence J





[ Images ]

                                        There are no images at the moment
                                    




[ Location Map ]





Get Directions to Keating, Terrence J >>



[ Videos ]











[ Reviews ]

                                        There are no reviews at the moment
                                        
                                        

                                                Add Review  
                                            
                                        












About



                                Keating, Terrence J is one of the Operators or Apartment Buildings in Saint John, New Brunswick, located in 263 Douglas Ave, E2K 1E5. Contact a representative of Keating, Terrence J at 506-693-5854 for your queries.
                            




Business Keywords











Claim This














                                    Is this your business, if so
                                    
                                    
                                        claim It!

                                    Get the benefits of managing your business listing.
                                    
                                


Contact Keating, Terrence J for coupons and promotions




Keating, Terrence J provides products/services related to Operators or Apartment Buildings













                                        Promotions
Close

















                                Owner Information
Close




Ownership Problem : 
Claim






                                Map and directions
Close



                            From here:
                        


                            To here:
                        





















                                Perview
Close












                                Report
Close







Select a Reason
Spam
Sexual content
Violent or repulsive content
Hateful or Abusive content
Harmful dangerous acts
Copyright violation
Duplicate Content
Meaningless Content


 Reason is required

Now add a little more detail(optional)


















Popular Businesses in Saint John Park Place Apartments A-1 Property Management-Mntnc Allan Property Management Ellerdale Investments LtdView All





Recently added in Saint John Surplus Furniture and Mattress Warehouse Cantini Law Group Massage Experts Saint John Zwebra Web Studio Inc.View All













Keating, Terrence J in Saint John | Saint John Phone Pages | Operators or Apartment Buildings in Saint John



People who viewed this also visited: 


A-1 Property Management & Mntc506-333-2074280 Mark DrVisitG Forbes Holdings Inc506-642-53503 Shamrock StVisitEllerdale Investments Ltd506-635-88221190 Fairville BlvdVisit











Business Listings:  
        A  |  B  |  C  |  D  |  E  |  F  |  G  |  H  |  I  |  J  |  K  |  L  |  M  |  N  |  O  |  P  |  Q  |  R  |  S  |  T  |  U  |  V  |  W  |  X  |  Y  |  Z  |  Newly Added



            Business Search:


               Change Location 



                        Advanced Search







Recently Updated BusinessesWellness Programs OttawaBuilding Restoration & Preservation OttawaAutomotive Dealers Nec OttawaMotor Vehicle Parts and Accessories OttawaDriving Instruction Ottawa


Most Active Canadian ProvincesOntario Business DirectoryBritish Columbia Business DirectoryQuebec Business DirectoryAlberta Business DirectoryManitoba Business Directory


Most Active CitiesCalgary Business DirectoryToronto Business DirectoryEdmonton Business DirectoryVancouver Business DirectoryMontreal Business Directory












More Ways to Search: 

Reverse Lookup
People Phone Pages
Address Search
Neighbourhood Search
Advance Search


More Info: 

Terms of Use

Privacy Policy
Change Your City
Saint John Trends


Contact: 

About Phone Pages
Contact
Careers
Site Feedback


Advertise: 

 Packages
Advertise With Us
Small Business Advertising
All in One





        © 2017 
            Phone Pages All rights reserved.
	

Advertise with us 1-888-984-1934
	













403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.






Terrence J  Keating - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Terrence J  Keating
Check out list of companies and businesses related to Terrence J  Keating. Find out Terrence J  Keating address and contact details. View other people related to Terrence J  Keating - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

7140 OFFICE CIRCLE  EVANSVILLE 47715 IN




Companies related to Terrence J  Keating
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0000018172CASTLE A M & CODirector 1420 KENSINGTON ROAD SUITE 220 OAK BROOK 605230000026780DANA INCDirector PO BOX 1000  MAUMEE 435370000817979ACCURIDE CORPChairman ACCURIDE 7140 OFFICE CIRCLE EVANSVILLE 477150000892553CHART INDUSTRIES INCDirector ONE INFINITY CORPORATE CENTRE DRIVE SUITE 300 GARFIELD HEIGHTS 44125-5370




Terrence J  Keating on the Web
Persons related to Terrence J  Keating - CASTLE A M & CONamePositionCityBRIAN P  ANDERSONDirector BRIAN P  ANDERSONDirector FRANKLIN PARKBRIAN P  ANDERSONDirector OAK BROOKPatrick R.  AndersonEVP, CFO & Treasurer FRANKLIN PARKPatrick R.  AndersonFRANKLIN PARKPatrick R.  AndersonInterim CFO, CAO, Controller OAK BROOKJERRY M  AUFOXCorp. Counsel & Secretary FRANKLIN PARKALBERT J  BIEMERVice President, Supply Chain FRANKLIN PARKALBERT J  BIEMERVice President - Supply Chain OAK BROOKLAWRENCE A  BOIKVP, CFO & Treasurer FRANKLIN PARKLAWRENCE A  BOIKVP, CFO & Treasurer NAPERVILLELAWRENCE A  BOIKFRANKLIN PARKJose-Luis  Bretones-LopezVP, Sourcing & Supply Chain OAK BROOKHoward Brod  BrownsteinDirector CONSHOCKENRichard N  BurgerDirector WAUKEGANJAMES  CALLANPres., Castle Metals Aerospace OAK BROOKMark Alexander  CohenNEW YORKKevin  CoughlinVP, Operations FRANKLIN PARKKevin  CoughlinVP, Operations OAK BROOKJames Michael  CoulsonVP Midwest Regional Manager FRANKLIN PARKEDWARD F  CULLITONVice President FRANKLIN PARKSCOTT J  DOLANPresident and CEO OAK BROOKTHOMAS A  DONAHOEDirector FRANKLIN PARKReuben Simpson  DonnelleyDirector OAK BROOKAnn M  DrakeDirector FRANKLIN PARKAnn M  DrakeDirector OAK BROOKMarec Elden  EdgarEVP, GC, Sec & Chief Admin Off OAK BROOKKevin P  FitzpatrickVP, Human Resources FRANKLIN PARKKevin P  FitzpatrickVP, Human Resources FRANKLIN PARKKevin P  FitzpatrickVP, Human Resources OAK BROOKFOM CorpCHICAGOTHOMAS L  GARRETTVP, President, Total Plastics FRANKLIN PARKTHOMAS L  GARRETTPres., Total Plastics, Inc. OAK BROOKKEVIN H  GLYNNFRANKLIN PARKKEVIN H  GLYNNVP, Information Technology OAK BROOKKEVIN H  GLYNNVP & CIO OAK BROOKMICHAEL H  GOLDBERGPresident & CEO FRANKLIN PARKMICHAEL H  GOLDBERGPresident & CEO FRANKLIN PARKMICHAEL H  GOLDBERGPresident & CEO OAK BROOKWILLIAM K  HALLDirector BUTLERWILLIAM K  HALLDirector FRANKLIN PARKROBERT S  HAMADADirector FRANKLIN PARKPATRICK J  HERBERT IIIDirector FRANKLIN PARKPATRICK J  HERBERT IIIDirector OAK BROOKMICHAEL BRUCE  HERRONMICHAEL BRUCE  HERRONVice President FRANKLIN PARKSherry L  HollandFRANKLIN PARKSTEPHEN V  HOOKSPresident, Castle Metals FRANKLIN PARKSTEPHEN V  HOOKSFRANKLIN PARKSTEPHEN V  HOOKSPresident, Castle Metals FRANKLIN PARKSTEPHEN V  HOOKSPresident, Castle Metals OAK BROOKBrownstein  HowardOak BrookROBERT  HUDSONVice President FRANKLIN PARKMellin  JonathanOak BrookNicholas  JonesVP, Pres Castle Metals Oil&Gas FRANKLIN PARKNicholas  JonesVP, Pres Castle Metals Oil&Gas OAK BROOKTerrence J  KeatingDirector EVANSVILLETerrence J  KeatingDirector FRANKLIN PARKTerrence J  KeatingDirector OAK BROOKTerrence J  KeatingDirector OAK BROOKJames Dewey  KellyDirector COLUMBUSJames Dewey  KellyDirector FRANKLIN PARKJames Dewey  KellyDirector OAK BROOKRONALD E  KNOPPEVP & Chief Operating Officer OAK BROOKTIM  LAFONTAINEVice President FRANKLIN PARKROBERT L  LERNERPRINCETONSTEPHEN JAMES  LETNICHChief Commercial Officer OAK BROOKPamela Forbes  LiebermanDirector FRANKLIN PARKPamela Forbes  LiebermanDirector FRANKLIN PARKPamela Forbes  LiebermanDirector OAK BROOKEdgar  MarecOak BrookWILLIAM C  MARTIN10% Owner WILLIAM C  MARTIN10% Owner ROCKY HILLGARY A  MASSEDirector RALEIGHGARY A  MASSEDirector OAK BROOKJOHN  MCCARTNEYDirector FRANKLIN PARKJOHN  MCCARTNEYDirector OAK BROOKG THOMAS  MCKANEChairman of the Board FRANKLIN PARKJonathan  MellinDirector OAK BROOKSheehan  MichaelOak BrookLieberman  PamelaOak BrookAnderson  PatrickOak BrookROBERT J  PERNAVP, GC & Secretary FRANKLIN PARKROBERT J  PERNAVP, GC & Secretary OAK BROOKJAMES  PODOJILFRANKLIN PARKJOHN W  PUTHDirector FRANKLIN PARKRaging Capital Management, LLCPRINCETONRaging Capital Management, LLCROCKY HILLRaging Capital Master Fund, Ltd.CAMANA BAY, GRAND CAYMANKnopp  RonaldOak BrookCurtis  SamfordPres., Castle Metals Oil & Gas FRANKLIN PARKAnne  ScharmVP Human Resources OAK BROOKSteve  ScheinkmanPresident & CEO CLAYMONTSteve  ScheinkmanMECHANICSBURGPATRICIA J  SCHMEDAVP, Information Technology FRANKLIN PARKPaul  SchwindController, CAO SCHAUMBURGSH Capital Partners, L.P.NEW YORKMichael J  SheehanDirector NATICKMICHAEL  SIMPSONDirector FRANKLIN PARKMICHAEL  SIMPSONDirector OAK BROOKPaul Coursey  SorensenVP, President Oil & Gas OAK BROOKScott F  StephensDES PLAINESScott F  StephensVice President, CFO & Treas. FRANKLIN PARKScott F  StephensVice President, CFO & Treas. FRANKLIN PARKScott F  StephensVP Finance/CFO OAK BROOKScheinkman  StevenOak BrookStone House Capital Management, LLC10% Owner NEW YORKBlain  TiffanyPres., Castle Metals Aerospace FRANKLIN PARKBlain  TiffanyVP, President-Castle Metals OAK BROOKKENNETH H  TRAUBDirector ELMSFORDKENNETH H  TRAUB PRINCETONWB & CO10% Owner CHICAGOCRAIG R  WILSONVice President FRANKLIN PARKPAUL J  WINSAUERVP, Human Resources FRANKLIN PARKAllan J  YoungDirector NEW YORKAllan J  YoungROCKY HILLAngelo Jeffrey  ZapponeOAK BROOKMichael  ZundelFRANKLIN PARKPersons related to Terrence J  Keating - DANA INCNamePositionCityAziz  AghiliPres Off-Hwy Technologies MAUMEEAPPALOOSA INVESTMENT LP ICHATHAMAPPALOOSA MANAGEMENT LPCHATAMAPPALOOSA PARTNERS INCCHATHAMJeffrey  AronsonNEW YORKJeffrey  Aronson10% Owner NEW YORKBENJAMIN F  BAILARBENJAMIN F  BAILARDirector TOLEDOA CHARLES  BAILLIEA CHARLES  BAILLIEDirector TOLEDODAVID E  BERGESDirector TOLEDOKevin B  BiddleV.P. and Ops Controller TOLEDOKevin B  BiddleV.P. and Ops Controller MAUMEEJeffrey S  BowenChief Administrative Officer MAUMEEMartin D  BryantPresident, Driveshaft Products TOLEDOMartin D  BryantPres- Light Vehicle Group MAUMEEMICHAEL J  BURNSChairman, CEO, TOLEDOMICHAEL J  BURNSSWITZERLANDEDMUND M  CARPENTEREDMUND M  CARPENTERDirector TOLEDOWILLIAM J  CARROLLWILLIAM J  CARROLLActing President & TOLEDOCenterbridge Associates, L.P.NEW YORKCenterbridge Associates, L.P.NEW YORKCenterbridge Capital Partners B Co-Investment, L.P.NEW YORKCenterbridge Capital Partners B Co-Investment, L.P.NEW YORKCENTERBRIDGE CAPITAL PARTNERS L PDirector NEW YORKCenterbridge Capital Partners SBS, L.P.Director NEW YORKCenterbridge Capital Partners SBS, L.P.NEW YORKCENTERBRIDGE CAPITAL PARTNERS STRATEGIC L PDirector NEW YORKCENTERBRIDGE CAPITAL PARTNERS STRATEGIC L PNEW YORKCenterbridge GP Investors, LLCNEW YORKCenterbridge GP Investors, LLCNEW YORKGilberto  CerattiTOLEDOERIC  CLARKERIC  CLARKDirector TOLEDOBERNARD N  COLEBERNARD N  COLEVice President and TOLEDOJonathan Mark  CollinsEVP & Chief Financial Officer MAUMEEGeorge T  ConstandChief Technical & Quality Offi TOLEDOGeorge T  ConstandChief Technical & Quality Offi MAUMEEGary L  ConvisVice Chairman TOLEDOGary L  ConvisVice Chairman MAUMEEPat  D'EramoPres, Commercial Vehicle Drive MAUMEEMichael L  DeBackerTOLEDOJACQUELINE A  DEDOVP Strategy & Bus. Development TOLEDOJACQUELINE A  DEDOChief Strategy Officer MAUMEEJOHN M  DEVINEExecutive Chairman TOLEDOJOHN M  DEVINEExec Chairman MAUMEERichard J  DyerChief Acct'g Officer TOLEDORichard J  DyerVP & Chief Accounting Officer TOLEDORichard J  DyerVP & Chief Accounting Officer MAUMEERobert A  FesenmyerTOLEDORodney R  FilcekSVP & Chief Acctg Offic TOLEDORodney R  FilcekSVP & Chief Acctg Offic MAUMEEMARVIN A  FRANKLIN IIIMARVIN A  FRANKLIN IIIVice President and TOLEDORichard Marcel  GabrysDirector TOLEDOMark T  GalloglyDirector TOLEDOMark T  GalloglyDirector MAUMEEMark T  GalloglyDirector NEW YORKMark T  GalloglyNEW YORKRichard A  GEPHARDTDirector TOLEDOSAMIR G  GIBARADirector TOLEDOStephen J  GirskyDirector TOLEDOStephen J  GirskyDirector MAUMEERalf  GoettelTOLEDORalf  GoettelPres-Eur/Seal/Thermal Prod Grp TOLEDOErnesto  Gonzalez-BeltranSenior VP - Global Operations MAUMEERachel A  GonzalezDirector DALLASCHERYL W  GRISEDirector TOLEDOCHARLES F  HEINECHARLES F  HEINEPres-Tech Developmnt TOLEDOKENNETH A  HILTZTOLEDOGLEN H  HINERGLEN H  HINERDirector TOLEDOJames Kevin  KamsickasPresident & CEO MAUMEEVIRGINIA A  KAMSKYDirector NEW YORKVIRGINIA A  KAMSKYDirector MAUMEETerrence J  KeatingDirector EVANSVILLETerrence J  KeatingDirector TOLEDOTerrence J  KeatingDirector MAUMEEJAMES P  KELLYJAMES P  KELLYDirector TOLEDOJAMES M  LAISUREJAMES M  LAISUREVice President and TOLEDOMarc S  LevinSVP, General Counsel & Secty TOLEDOMarc S  LevinSVP, General Counsel & Secty MAUMEEDouglas H  LiedbergSVP, General Counsel and Secty MAUMEERaymond E  MabusDirector NEW YORKJOSEPH M  MAGLIOCHETTIJOSEPH M  MAGLIOCHETTIChairman, President TOLEDOROBERT H  MARCINChief Administrative Officer TOLEDOROBERT H  MARCINEVP & Chief Admin Officer MAUMEEMARILYN R  MARKSMARILYN R  MARKSDirector TOLEDODwayne  MatthewsPres - Power Technologies Grp MAUMEETERRY R  MCCORMACKTERRY R  MCCORMACKPres-Automotive TOLEDOR BRUCE  MCDONALDDirector MILWAUKEER BRUCE  MCDONALDDirector MAUMEEBrandt  McKeeDirector MAUMEEPaul E  MillerTOLEDOPaul E  MillerVice President-Purchasing TOLEDOJOSEPH C  MUSCARIDirector PITTSBURGHJOSEPH C  MUSCARIDirector MAUMEEPALOMINO FUND LTDCHATHAMAri  PapadakosSenior Vice President of H.R. MAUMEERICHARD B  PRIORYRICHARD B  PRIORYDirector TOLEDORobert D  PylePres, Light Vehicle Driveline MAUMEEWILLIAM G  QUIGLEY IIIEVP and CFO VAN BUREN TOWNSHIPWILLIAM G  QUIGLEY IIIEVP and CFO MAUMEEROBERT C  RICHTERROBERT C  RICHTERVice President and TOLEDOMARK A  SCHULZDirector DEARBORNMARK A  SCHULZDirector TOLEDOMARK A  SCHULZDirector MAUMEEEric W  SchwarzChief Purchasing Officer TOLEDOEric W  SchwarzChief Purchasing Officer MAUMEESteven  SchwarzwaelderDirector MAUMEEFERNANDO  SENDEROSFERNANDO  SENDEROSDirector TOLEDOABDALLAH F  SHANTIVP & Chief Information Officer TOLEDOSilver Point Capital L.P.10% Owner GREENWICH,Silver Point Capital L.P.GREENWICHSilver Point Capital L.P.10% Owner GREENWICHSilver Point Capital L.P.10% Owner GREENWICHNick L  StanageTOLEDONick L  StanagePresident-Hvy Vehicle Products TOLEDOThomas R  StoneTOLEDOThomas R  StonePres-Lt Axle Prods Grp, ASG TOLEDOJAMES E  SWEETNAMPresident & CEO TOLEDOJAMES E  SWEETNAMPresident & CEO TOLEDOJAMES E  SWEETNAMPresident & CEO MAUMEEDAVID A  TEPPERCHATHAMDAVID A  TEPPER10% Owner CHATHAMRalph A  ThanVice President and Treasurer TOLEDORalph A  ThanVice President and Treasurer MAUMEEDouglas S  TracyVP & Chief Information Officer TOLEDODouglas S  TracyVP & Chief Information Officer MAUMEEDavid P  TrucanoTOLEDODavid P  TrucanoDirector MAUMEEMark E  WallaceEVP & Pres Comm Veh Drive Tech TOLEDOMark E  WallaceEVP & Pres-On Hwy Technologies MAUMEERICHARD F  WALLMANDirector MAUMEEKEITH E  WANDELLDirector ROCKFORDKEITH E  WANDELLDirector TOLEDOKEITH E  WANDELLDirector MAUMEERICHARD J  WESTERHEIDEChief Acct'g Officer TOLEDOROGER  WOODDirector CHICAGOROGER  WOODPresident & CEO MAUMEEJEROME B  YORKDirector MAUMEEJEROME B  YORKDirector TOLEDOJAMES A  YOSTExecutive V.P. and CFO TOLEDOJAMES A  YOSTExecutive V.P. and CFO MAUMEEPersons related to Terrence J  Keating - ACCURIDE CORPNamePositionCityDavid Gordon  AdamsPresident, Brillion Iron Works EVANSVILLEDavid Gordon  AdamsSVP Brillion EVANSVILLEDavid Gordon  AdamsPresident, Brillion Iron Works EVANSVILLEROBIN J  ADAMSDirector DETROITROBIN J  ADAMSDirector EVANSVILLEROBIN J  ADAMSDirector EVANSVILLEMICHAEL E.  ALGERDirector BOCA RATONDavid K  ArmstrongSr VP/CFO EVANSVILLEMichael J  BevacquaDirector BOSTONMary Elizabeth  BlairSr. VP/Supply Chain Mgt. EVANSVILLEMary Elizabeth  BlairSr. VP/Supply Chain Mgt. EVANSVILLEMary Elizabeth  BlairSVP/Supply Chain Mgt. EVANSVILLEJay R  BloomDirector NEW YORKJay R  BloomDirector NEW YORKKEITH E  BUSSEDirector KEITH E  BUSSEDirector EVANSVILLEKEITH E  BUSSEDirector EVANSVILLECharles Michael Jr.  ByrnesSr. VP-Sales & Marketing EVANSVILLECharles Michael Jr.  ByrnesSVP-Sales & Marketing EVANSVILLECharles Michael Jr.  ByrnesSVP-Sales & Marketing EVANSVILLECaravelle Investment Fund, L.L.C.NEW YORKCetus Capital II, LLC10% Owner GREENWICHCetus Capital II, LLC10% Owner GREENWICHCetus Capital III, L.P.10% Owner GREENWICHCetus Capital, LLC10% Owner GREENWICHCetus Capital, LLCGREENWICHCetus Capital, LLC10% Owner GREENWICHCIBC Capital CORPNEW YORKCIBC Capital CORPNEW YORKCIBC Employee Private Equity Fund (Trimaran) PartnersNEW YORKCIBC Employee Private Equity Fund (Trimaran) PartnersNEW YORKJames  CirarSr VP - Gunite and Brillion EVANSVILLEColiseum Capital, LLCNEW YORKColiseum Capital Management, LLC10% Owner NEW YORKColiseum Capital Management, LLC10% Owner STAMFORDColiseum Capital Partners II, L.P.STAMFORDCOLISEUM CAPITAL PARTNERS L PNEW YORKMark D  DaltonDirector NEW YORKMark D  DaltonDirector EVANSVILLERICHARD F  DAUCHPresident & CEO DETROITRICHARD F  DAUCHPresident & CEO EVANSVILLERICHARD F  DAUCHPresident & CEO EVANSVILLERICHARD F  DAUCHPresident & CEO EVANSVILLERICHARD F  DAUCHPresident & CEO EVANSVILLERobert E.  DavisDirector GREENWICHRobert E.  DavisDirector GREENWICHAnthony Allen  Donatelli SrSr VP/Imperial & Bostrom EVANSVILLEJohn Donald Jr.  DurrettDirector EVANSVILLEBenjamin  DusterDirector EVANSVILLEBenjamin  DusterDirector EVANSVILLETODD A  FISHERNEW YORKTODD A  FISHERDirector NEW YORKSteven K.  GendalWHITE PLAINSEDWARD A  GILHULYNEW YORKPERRY  GOLKINNEW YORKPERRY  GOLKINNEW YORKFREDERICK M  GOLTZDirector NEW YORKFREDERICK M  GOLTZNEW YORKAdam  GrayNEW YORKJAMES H  GREENE JRDirector NEW YORKJAMES H  GREENE JRDirector NEW YORKSHELLEY F  GREENHAUSWHITE PLAINSEdward James  GuldaSr. VP Component Operations EVANSVILLEMICHAEL A  HAJOSTSVP/Chief Financial Officer READINGElizabeth I  HammeSr VP/Human Resources EVANSVILLEScott D.  HazlettPresident, Accuride Wheels EVANSVILLEScott D.  HazlettSr.VP/GM Accuride Wheels EVANSVILLEScott D.  HazlettSVP Operations Accuride EVANSVILLEANDREW R  HEYER10% Owner NEW YORKANDREW R  HEYER10% Owner NEW YORKSteven James  HoltSr VP/Strategy, Growth & Tech. EVANSVILLEHubcap Acquisition LLCNEW YORKHubcap Acquisition LLCNEW YORKJOHANNES P  HUTHNEW YORKJOHANNES P  HUTHNEW YORKDONALD T  JOHNSON JRDirector DOWNERS GROVEDONALD T  JOHNSON JRDirector EVANSVILLEDONALD T  JOHNSON JRDirector EVANSVILLEDONALD T  JOHNSON JRDirector DOWNERS GROVEDONALD T  JOHNSON JRDirector WESTMONTDONALD T  JOHNSON JRDirector WESTMONTDONALD T  JOHNSON JRDirector DOWNERS GROVETerrence J  KeatingChairman EVANSVILLETerrence J  KeatingChairman EVANSVILLEDean C  Kehler10% Owner NEW YORKDean C  Kehler10% Owner NEW YORKRobert James  KellyDirector EVANSVILLEKKR 1996 FUND L PNEW YORKKKR 1996 FUND L PNEW YORKKKR 1996 GP LLC NEW YORKKKR 1996 GP LLC NEW YORKKKR ASSOCIATES 1996 L PNEW YORKKKR ASSOCIATES 1996 L PNEW YORKLEWIS M  KLINGDirector IRVINGLEWIS M  KLINGDirector EVANSVILLEHENRY R  KRAVIS10% Owner NEW YORKHENRY R  KRAVISNEW YORKRODGER R  KROUSEBOCA RATONRODGER R  KROUSEBOCA RATONWILLIAM M  LASKYDirector EVANSVILLEWILLIAM M  LASKYDirector EVANSVILLEWILLIAM M  LASKY EVANSVILLEJONATHAN S  LAVINE10% Owner BOSTONJONATHAN S  LAVINE10% Owner BOSTONMARC J  LEDERBOCA RATONMARC J  LEDERBOCA RATONStephen S.  LedouxDirector EVANSVILLEStephen S.  LedouxDirector EVANSVILLELITTLEJOHN ASSOCIATES III, L.L.C.GREENWICHLITTLEJOHN ASSOCIATES III, L.L.C.GREENWICHLittlejohn Associates IV, L.L.C.GREENWICHLittlejohn Fund III L PGREENWICHLittlejohn Fund III L PGREENWICHLittlejohn Fund IV, L.P.10% Owner GREENWICHLittlejohn Opportunities GP LLCGREENWICHLittlejohn Opportunities GP LLCGREENWICHLittlejohn Opportunities Master Fund LPGREENWICHLittlejohn Opportunities Master Fund LP10% Owner GREENWICHLittlejohn Opportunities Master Fund LP10% Owner GREENWICHLittlejohn Opportunities Master Fund LPGREENWICHJames John  ManiatisSr. VP/Human Resources EVANSVILLEJames John  ManiatisSr. VP-Human Resources EVANSVILLEJames John  ManiatisSr. VP-Human Resources EVANSVILLEStephen Albert  MartinSVP-GC & HR/Corp. Secr. EVANSVILLEStephen Albert  MartinSr. VP-General Counsel EVANSVILLEStephen Albert  MartinSVP-GC & HR/Corp Secr. EVANSVILLERichard E.  MaybaumGREENWICHMICHAEL W  MICHELSONNEW YORKMICHAEL W  MICHELSONNEW YORKJAMES C  MOMTAZEEDirector NEW YORKDonald C  MuellerDirector BOCA RATONCRAIG H  MUHLHAUSERDirector EVANSVILLEJOHN RAYMOND  MURPHYPresident & CEO EVANSVILLEALEXANDAR  NAVAB JR NEW YORKALEXANDAR  NAVAB JRNEW YORKJASON H  NEIMARKDirector BOCA RATONROBERT  NIDASr VP/Operations EVANSVILLETERENCE M  OTOOLENEW YORKPROSPECT FUNDING I LLCBOSTONPROSPECT FUNDING I LLCBOSTONPROSPECT HARBOR CREDIT PARTNERS LPBOSTONPROSPECT HARBOR CREDIT PARTNERS LPBOSTONPROSPECT HARBOR INVESTORS, LLCBOSTONPROSPECT HARBOR INVESTORS, LLCBOSTONPROSPECT HARBOR INVESTORS, LLCBOSTONPAUL E  RAETHERNEW YORKPAUL E  RAETHERNEW YORKCHARLIE  RENTSCHLERDirector HARTSVILLECHARLIE  RENTSCHLERDirector EVANSVILLEGregory Alan  RischPresident, Gunite EVANSVILLEGregory Alan  RischVP/Chief Financial Officer EVANSVILLEGregory Alan  RischSVP/Chief Financial Officer EVANSVILLEJOHN W  RISNERDirector LARCHMONTJOHN W  RISNERDirector EVANSVILLEJOHN W  RISNERDirector EVANSVILLEJOHN W  RISNERDirector EVANSVILLEJOHN W  RISNERDirector EVANSVILLEGEORGE R  ROBERTSNEW YORKGEORGE R  ROBERTSNEW YORKDONALD C  ROOFDirector MILWAUKEEDONALD C  ROOFDirector MILWAUKEEDONALD C  ROOFDirector EVANSVILLEJAMES R  RULSEHDirector RACINEJAMES R  RULSEHDirector EVANSVILLEJAMES R  RULSEHDirector EVANSVILLEERIC M/  RUTTENBERGNEW YORKSANKATY CREDIT MEMBER, LLCBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT MEMBER, LLCBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT MEMBER, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Member (Offshore), Ltd.BOSTONSankaty Credit Member (Offshore), Ltd.BOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES II LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES II LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES II LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES III LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES III LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES III LPBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors II, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors II, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors II, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors III, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors III, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors III, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors IV, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors, LLCBOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors (Offshore) IV, L.P.BOSTONSankaty Credit Opportunities Investors (Offshore) IV, L.P.BOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES IV LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES IV LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES (OFFSHORE) IV LPBOSTONSANKATY CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES (OFFSHORE) IV LPBOSTONRichard Frederick  SchomerSr VP/Marketing & Sales EVANSVILLESCSF Debt Investments, LLCBOCA RATONSCSF Debt Investments, LLCBOCA RATONSCSF Equities, LLCBOCA RATONSCSF Equities, LLCBOCA RATONSCSF III Debt Investments, LPBOCA RATONSCSF III Debt Investments, LPBOCA RATONSenator Investment Group LP10% Owner NEW YORKSenator Investment Group LPNEW YORKSG Distressed Fund, LPGREENWICHSG Distressed Fund, LPGREENWICHSG Distressed Fund, LPGREENWICHSG Distressed Fund, LPGREENWICHChristopher S  ShackeltonNEW YORKKenneth Wayne  SparksSr. VP-Brillion & Gunite EVANSVILLEKenneth Wayne  SparksSr. VP-Gunite EVANSVILLEKenneth Wayne  SparksSVP/GM-Gunite EVANSVILLESCOTT M  STUARTNEW YORKSun Accuride Debt Investments, LLCBOCA RATONSun Accuride Debt Investments, LLC10% Owner BOCA RATONSun Capital Advisors V, L.P.BOCA RATONSun Capital Advisors V, L.P.BOCA RATONSUN CAPITAL PARTNERS V LPBOCA RATONSUN CAPITAL PARTNERS V LPBOCA RATONSun Capital Partners V, LtdBOCA RATONSun Capital Partners V, LtdBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities Advisors, LPBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities Advisors, LPBOCA RATONSUN CAPITAL SECURITIES FUND L PBOCA RATONSUN CAPITAL SECURITIES FUND L PBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities III, LLCBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities III, LLCBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities, LLCBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities, LLCBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities Offshore Fund LtdBOCA RATONSun Capital Securities Offshore Fund LtdBOCA RATONHenry L  TaylorSr VP/Sales & Marketing EVANSVILLEHenry L  TaylorSr VP/Sales & Marketing EVANSVILLETHOMAS V  TAYLORDirector BOCA RATONThird Point Advisors II L.L.C.NEW YORKThird Point Offshore Master Fund, L.P.10% Owner GEORGE TOWN, GRAND CAYMANTinicum Capital Partners II Executive Fund L.L.C.NEW YORKTINICUM CAPITAL PARTNERS II, L.P.NEW YORKTINICUM CAPITAL PARTNERS II PARALLEL FUND LPNEW YORKTinicum Lantern II, LLCDirector NEW YORKTrimaran Capital, L.L.C.NEW YORKTrimaran Capital, L.L.C.NEW YORKTrimaran Fund II, L.L.C.NEW YORKTrimaran Fund II, L.L.C.NEW YORKTrimaran Investments II, L.L.C.Director NEW YORKTrimaran Investments II, L.L.C.Director NEW YORKTrimaran Parallel Fund II, L.P.NEW YORKTrimaran Parallel Fund II, L.P.NEW YORKBrian J  UrbanekDirector BOCA RATONAndrew M  WellerExec VP/Ops EVANSVILLEDouglas C  WerkingBOCA RATONWHIPPOORWILL ASSOCIATES INC10% Owner WHITE PLAINSJAMES H  WOODWARD JRSr. VP/Chief Financial Officer EVANSVILLELeigh Alexander  WrightSr. VP-Wheels EVANSVILLELeigh Alexander  WrightSr. VP-Business Development EVANSVILLELeigh Alexander  WrightSr. VP-Business Development EVANSVILLEPersons related to Terrence J  Keating - CHART INDUSTRIES INCNamePositionCity101 HUNTINGTON HOLDINGS LLCBOSTONWILLIAM T  ALLENDirector CLEVELANDWILLIAM T  ALLENDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSAUDAX CHART LLC10% Owner BOSTONAUDAX GROUP LPBOSTONAUDAX HOLDINGS I LLCBOSTONAUDAX MANAGEMENT CO LLCBOSTONAUDAX PRIVATE EQUITY BUSINESS LLCBOSTONAUDAX PRIVATE EQUITY BUSINESS LPBOSTONAUDAX PRIVATE EQUITY FUND L PBOSTONMICHAEL F  BIEHLExecutive VP and CFO CLEVELANDMICHAEL F  BIEHLExec VP and CFO GARFIELD HEIGHTSMICHAEL F  BIEHLExecutive VP and CFO GARFIELD HEIGHTSW DOUGLAS  BROWNDirector ALLENTOWNW DOUGLAS  BROWNDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSW DOUGLAS  BROWNDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSMary C.  CookCAO and Controller GARFIELD HEIGHTSTIMOTHY H  DAYDirector GREENWICHJillian C.  EvankoGARFIELD HEIGHTSOLIVER C  EWALDDirector CLEVELANDOLIVER C  EWALDDirector BOSTONFIRST RESERVE FUND X LPGREENWICHFIRST RESERVE GP X INCDirector GREENWICHFIRST RESERVE GP X LPGREENWICHFR X Chart Holdings LLCGREENWICHRICHARD E  GOODRICHDirector THE WOODLANDSRICHARD E  GOODRICHDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSRICHARD E  GOODRICHDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSBEN A  GUILLDirector GREENWICHMICHAEL P  HARMONDirector LOS ANGELESMICHAEL P  HARMONDirector LOS ANGELESARTHUR S  HOLMESDirector CLEVELANDARTHUR S  HOLMESDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSJames H  Hoppel JRVP-Corp Development&Treasurer GARFIELD HEIGHTSJames H  Hoppel JRVP - Corp. Dev. and Treasurer GARFIELD HEIGHTSWilliam  JohnsonPresident & COO FLORENCESTEPHEN A  KAPLANLOS ANGELESTerrence J  KeatingDirector EVANSVILLETerrence J  KeatingDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSMatthew J  KlabenVP, General Counsel and Sec. GARFIELD HEIGHTSMatthew J  KlabenVP, General Counsel and Sec. GARFIELD HEIGHTSSTEVEN W  KRABLINDirector HOUSTONSTEVEN W  KRABLINDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSSTEVEN W  KRABLINDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSSTEVEN W  KRABLINDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSCHARLES R  LOVETTVice President - Manufacturing CLEVELANDCHARLES R  LOVETTVice President - Manufacturing GARFIELD HEIGHTSJOHN F  MCGOVERNDirector CLEVELANDJOHN F  MCGOVERNDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSMERRILL LYNCH & CO INCNEW YORKMERRILL LYNCH & CO INC10% Owner NEW YORKMERRILL LYNCH PIERCE FENNER & SMITH INCNEW YORKMICHAEL  MOLININIDirector Kenneth W  MooreDirector GREENWICHOAKTREE CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC10% Owner LOS ANGELESOAKTREE CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC10% Owner LOS ANGELESOCM PRINCIPAL OPPORTUNITIES FUND II LPLOS ANGELESOCM PRINCIPAL OPPORTUNITIES FUND II LPDirector LOS ANGELESOCM PRINCIPAL OPPORTUNITIES FUND II LPDirector LOS ANGELESMichael W  PressDirector HOUSTONMichael W  PressDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSMichael W  PressDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSQuintana Maritime Investors LLCGREENWICHGEOFFREY S  REHNERTDirector BOSTONElizabeth G.  SpomerDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSSAMUEL F  THOMASChairman and CEO CLEVELANDSAMUEL F  THOMASChairman, CEO and President GARFIELD HEIGHTSSAMUEL F  THOMASChairman, CEO and President GARFIELD HEIGHTSJAMES M  TIDWELLDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSJAMES M  TIDWELLDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSKenneth J  WebsterVice President and CFO GARFIELD HEIGHTSKenneth J  WebsterVice Pres., CAO and Controller GARFIELD HEIGHTSTIMOTHY J  WHITEDirector BOSTONThomas L  WilliamsDirector CLEVELANDThomas L  WilliamsDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSThomas L  WilliamsDirector GARFIELD HEIGHTSROBERT H  WOLFEV.P., General Counsel and Sec. THE WOODLANDSMARC B  WOLPOWBOSTON












 






